Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0365.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 660. (1) A person An individual operating an electric personal assistive mobility device, low-speed vehicle, electric skateboard, or moped upon a roadway shall ride as near to the right side of the roadway as practicable, shall exercise due care when passing a standing vehicle or a vehicle proceeding in the same direction, and shall not block, delay, or otherwise interfere with the movement of a streetcar on a streetcar track. (2) A motorcycle is entitled to full use of a lane, and a motor vehicle must not be driven in such a manner as to deprive a motorcycle of the full use of a lane. This subsection does not apply to motorcycles operated 2 abreast in a single lane or to the operation of a motorcycle in a manner that blocks, delays, or otherwise interferes with the movement of a streetcar on a streetcar track. (3) A person An individual riding an electric personal assistive mobility device, motorcycle, electric skateboard, or moped upon a roadway shall not ride more than 2 abreast except on a path or part of a roadway set aside for the exclusive use of those vehicles. (4) Where a usable and designated path for bicycles is provided adjacent to a highway or street, a person an individual operating an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard may, by local ordinance, be required to use that path. (5) A person Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual operating a motorcycle, moped, low-speed vehicle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or electric skateboard shall not pass between lines of traffic, but may pass on the left of traffic moving in his or her the same direction in the case of a 2-way street or on the left or right of traffic in the case of a 1-way street, in an unoccupied lane. An individual operating a 2-wheeled motorcycle may pass between lines of traffic if traffic is stopped or is moving at not more than 10 miles per hour in the same direction, and if all of the following apply: (a) The street has at least 2 adjacent lanes in the same direction of travel. (b) The individual travels at a speed not exceeding 15 miles per hour. (c) The individual first ascertains that the movement can be made safely. (6) A person An individual operating an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard on a sidewalk constructed for the use of pedestrians shall yield the right-of-way to a pedestrian and shall give an audible signal before overtaking and passing the pedestrian. (7) A moped, low-speed vehicle, or commercial quadricycle must not be operated on a sidewalk constructed for the use of pedestrians. (8) A low-speed vehicle or commercial quadricycle must not be operated at a speed of more than 25 miles per hour. A low-speed vehicle must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 35 miles per hour except for the purpose of crossing that highway or street. A commercial quadricycle must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 45 miles per hour except for the purpose of crossing that highway or street. An individual shall not operate a commercial quadricycle that is equipped with a motor unless he or she the individual has a valid operator's license issued under this act. The state transportation department may prohibit the operation of a low-speed vehicle or commercial quadricycle on any highway or street under its jurisdiction if it determines that the prohibition is necessary in the interest of public safety. (9) This section does not apply to a police officer in the performance of his or her the police officer's official duties. (10) An electric personal assistive mobility device must not be operated at a speed of more than 15 miles per hour and must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 25 miles per hour except to cross that highway or street. (11) An electric skateboard must not be operated at a speed of more than 25 miles per hour. An electric skateboard that does not have handlebars must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 25 miles per hour except to cross that highway or street, and an electric skateboard equipped with handlebars must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 45 miles per hour except to cross that highway or street. (12) The governing body of a county, a city, a village, an entity created under the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, or a township may, by ordinance based on the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens, regulate the operation of electric personal assistive mobility devices, electric skateboards, or commercial quadricycles on sidewalks, highways or streets, or crosswalks. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a governing body of a county, city, village, entity created under the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, or township may prohibit the operation of electric personal assistive mobility devices, electric skateboards or commercial quadricycles in an area open to pedestrian traffic adjacent to a waterfront or on a trail under its jurisdiction, in a downtown or central business district, or on a street that includes streetcar tracks. Signs indicating the regulation must be conspicuously posted in the area where the use of an electric personal assistive mobility device, electric skateboard, or commercial quadricycle is regulated. (13) Operation of an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard is prohibited in a special charter city and a state park under the jurisdiction of the Mackinac Island State Park commission. (14) Operation of an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard may be prohibited in a historic district. (15) The department of natural resources may by order regulate the use of electric personal assistive mobility devices or electric skateboards on all lands under its control.